Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1280.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Shipbuilding and Hands-on Instruction Pathways Act.Section 2. Findings and purpose.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) According to the United States Maritime Administration, as of 2019 the United States shipbuilding and repair industry supported approximately 393,000 jobs nationwide and contributed more than $42,000,000,000 to the gross domestic product.(2) Recent private investment, including a $5,000,000,000 modernization initiative at the Hanwha 12345678910111213141516171819 Philadelphia Shipyard, formerly the Aker Philadelphia Shipyard, demonstrates the potential for Pennsylvania to grow its maritime industrial base and create family-sustaining jobs.(3) Shipbuilding and maritime trades are critical not only in Philadelphia, but also in western Pennsylvania, where barge and towboat operations drive river commerce and in Erie, where Great Lakes ship repair supports regional trade.(4) Pennsylvania's location also provides close access to major east coast shipbuilding centers and trade ports, strengthening the Commonwealth's role in the national maritime economy.(5) To capture these opportunities, the Commonwealth must ensure that students looking to join the workforce have access to coursework and hands-on training aligned with shipbuilding and maritime careers.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Eligible applicant." A school district, area career and technical school, career and technical center or intermediate unit that is approved by the department to offer or support career and technical education programs."Program of study." A career and technical education curriculum framework established by the department under Article XVIII of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.20260SB1280PN1590 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Shipbuilding and hands-on instruction pathways.(a) Development.--Within 12 months of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall establish and publish a Statewide program of study in shipbuilding and maritime trades.(b) Standards.--The program of study shall:(1) Align to industry-recognized credentials in the fields of shipbuilding and maritime trades that include welding, pipe fitting, structural fabrication, marine electrical systems, coatings and safety.(2) Be designed to align with registered pre-apprenticeship and apprenticeship programs registered with or otherwise recognized by the Department of Labor and Industry.(3) Include recommended equipment lists, task list and safety requirements.(4) Include pathways for dual-enrollment with community colleges and opportunities to earn postsecondary credit and for employment in shipbuilding or maritime trades.Section 5. Grants.(a) Establishment.--The department shall administer a competitive grant program to support eligible applicants offering a shipbuilding and maritime trades program of study.(b) Use of funds.--Grants awarded to an eligible applicant may be used for the following if the department finds that the use aligns with the program of study:(1) Purchase of equipment and instructional materials.(2) Teacher externships or professional development.(3) Startup costs for dual-enrollment courses, work-based learning opportunities or other program implementation costs approved by the department.(4) Additional costs deemed appropriate by the 20260SB1280PN1590 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department.Section 6. Coordination.The department shall coordinate with:(1) The Department of Labor and Industry to support alignment between the program of study, pre-apprenticeship and apprenticeship programs.(2) Area career and technical schools, secondary schools offering approved career and technical education programs and community colleges to align curriculum, equipment standards and postsecondary credit opportunities that support student transitions into shipbuilding and maritime careers.(3) Shipbuilding and maritime employers, organized labor suppliers, contractors and other relevant stakeholders selected by the department to identify workforce needs and provide work-based learning opportunities.Section 7. Reporting.(a) Report to department.--An eligible applicant that receives a grant under this act shall submit information to the department in a form and manner required by the department on program participation and outcomes.(b) Report by department.--The department shall submit an annual report to the chair and minority chair of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives that includes the following:(1) Grant awards under this act.(2) The number of students participating in a shipbuilding and maritime trades program of study supported by a grand under this act.(3) To the extent that information is available to the 20260SB1280PN1590 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department, outcomes for participating students, including:(i) Industry-recognized credentials earned.(ii) Dual-enrollment credits earned.(iii) Entry into employment in shipbuilding, maritime trades or related industries.(iv) Entry into a registered pre-apprenticeship or apprenticeship program.Section 8. Funding.(a) Appropriation.--The General Assembly shall appropriate funds to the department for the purposes of this act.(b) Alternative funds.--The department may utilize funding from:(1) The Strengthening Career and Technical Education for the 21st Century Act (Public Law 115-224, 132 Stat. 1563).(2) The Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128, 128 Stat. 1425).(3) Other Federal, State or local sources.(4) Private funds to support implementation.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1280PN1590 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920